Hawaii statutes.
§183D-27 Night hunting on private lands;
prohibition. Notwithstanding section 183D-26, no person shall take or
pursue any game bird, game mammal, wild bird, or wild mammal at night on
privately owned lands, except as authorized by the department pursuant to
section 183D-61. For the purpose of this section, "night" means the
period between one-half hour after sunset and one-half hour before sunrise. [L
1985, c 174, pt of §4; am L 1987, c 156, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next